Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.16.030

Abstract of vote.

If three-fifths of the votes cast on the proposition favor the reduction of the corporate limits, the county auditor shall make and transmit to the office of the secretary of state a certified abstract of the vote.

[ 1994 c 223 s 40; 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.16.030.]